California, session 20252026, SB744.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 144.7 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:144.7. (a) For purposes of any code or statute, a national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as of January 1, 2025, shall retain that recognition until July 1, 2029, provided that the accrediting agency continues to operate in substantially the same manner as it did on January 1, 2025.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 66010 of the Education Code is amended to read:66010. (a) Public higher education consists of (1) the California Community Colleges, (2) the California State University, and each campus, branch, and function thereof, and (3) each campus, branch, and function of the University of California.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), as used in this part, “independent institutions of higher education” are those nonpublic higher education institutions that grant undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that are formed as nonprofit corporations in this state and are accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.(2) For purposes of any code or statute, a national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as of January 1, 2025, shall retain that recognition until July 1, 2029, provided that the accrediting agency continues to operate in substantially the same manner as it did on January 1, 2025.(c) No provision of this part is intended to regulate, subsidize, or intrude upon private education, including, but not limited to, independent educational institutions and religious schools, nor to vary existing state law or state constitutional provisions relating to private education.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 66010 is added to the Education Code, to read:66010. (a) Public higher education consists of (1) the California Community Colleges, (2) the California State University, and each campus, branch, and function thereof, and (3) each campus, branch, and function of the University of California.(b) As used in this part, “independent institutions of higher education” are those nonpublic higher education institutions that grant undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that are formed as nonprofit corporations in this state and are accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.(c) No provision of this part is intended to regulate, subsidize, or intrude upon private education, including, but not limited to, independent educational institutions and religious schools, nor to vary existing state law or state constitutional provisions relating to private education.(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.